District of Columbia statutes.
9-115.11

Re-opening of Klingle Road.

Notwithstanding any other law, the portion of Klingle Road, N.W., between Porter Street, N.W., on the east, to Cortland Place, N.W., on the west, which portion is currently closed to motor vehicle traffic, shall not be re-opened to the public for motor vehicle traffic. No funding, District, federal, or otherwise, shall be expended or accepted for the planning, design, construction, or reconstruction of this portion of Klingle Road for motor vehicle traffic.

Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 2402, 50 DCR 5668
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 6017, 55 DCR 7598

Short title of title XXIV of Law 15-39: Section 2401 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title XXIV of the act may be cited as the Klingle Road Restoration Act of 2003.

Short title: Section 6016 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle F of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Klingle Road Sustainable Development Amendment Act of 2008”.

For specified funding for Klingle Road, see sections 6018 and 6019 of Law 17-219.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2302 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2302 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
D.C. Law 17-219 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “The portion of Klingle Road, N.W., between Porter Street, N.W., on the east to Cortland Place, N.W., on the west shall be re-opened to the public for motor vehicle traffic, with the repair and reconstruction of Klingle Road, which shall include the establishment of a District Department of Transportation storm water management plan, to commence no later than 180 days following November 13, 2003.”
District of Columbia administration, employment practices of contractors, First Source requirements, “beneficiary” and “government-assisted project” defined, see § 2-219.01.